Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1358
Uniformity of application and interpretation.

In applying and construing the Uniform Registration of Canadian Money Judgments Act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 22.